Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-1105
Cases pending on September 6, 1991; assignment to Court of Appeals.

Any case on appeal before the Supreme Court on September 6, 1991, except cases in which a sentence of death or life imprisonment has been imposed and cases involving the constitutionality of a statute, may be assigned to the Court of Appeals by the Supreme Court.

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB268, § 35;

Referendum 2016, No. 426.
The repeal of section 24-1105 by Laws 2015, LB 268, section 35, is not effective because of the vote on the referendum at the November 2016 general election.